src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
* bæhkkát # Contracted test examples:*
* *bæhkkáv:* `bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *bähkkáv:* `bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *bæhkkájiv:* `bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *bähkkájiv:* `bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *bæhkkájma:* `bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *bähkkájma:* `bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON DULLUT_IV   Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. Only Sg3 passiv.

* dussut # Contracted test examples:*
* *dussuv:* `dussut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *dussujiv:* `dussut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *dussujma:* `dussut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON TJUOLLÁT_TV    Inceptiv. All passive. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation,  (gullát, bårråt)

* gajkkát # Contracted test examples:*
* *gajkkáv:* `gajkkát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *gajkkájiv:* `gajkkát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *gajkkájma:* `gajkkát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON STRÁFFUT_TV    Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. All duvvat passives. 

* gáhpput # Contracted test examples:*
* *gáhppuv:* `gáhpput+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *gáhppujiv:* `gáhpput+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *gáhppujma:* `gáhpput+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON TSIEGGIT_TV   Makes nouns via -ár derivation. All duvvat passives. 

* gámmpit # Contracted test examples:*
* *gámmpiv:* `gámmpit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *gámmpijiv:* `gámmpit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *gámmpijma:* `gámmpit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *gámmpár:* `gámmpit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON VALLIT_TV  Makes nouns via -ár derivation. Gets only passive Sg3

* hinnit # Contracted test examples:*
* *hinniv:* `hinnit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *hinnijiv:* `hinnit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *hinnijma:* `hinnit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *hinnár:* `hinnit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom`

contraced verbs assimilated and outside the main pattern.

LEXICON PLÁNIT_TV  Transitive Two-syll contraced words not in third grade as contraced verb have been. Two syllable transitive NEW loan verbs. Makes nouns via -ár derivation. All passives.

* hinnit # Contracted test examples:*
* *bloaggiv:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *blåggiv:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *bloaggijiv:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *blåggijiv:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *bloaggijma:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *blåggijma:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *bloaggár:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom`
* *blåggår:* `bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON SLEDUT_IV  Intransitive Two-syll contraced words not in third grade as contraced verb have been. Only Sg3 passiv.

* håŋŋlit # Contracted test examples:*
* *håŋŋliv:* `håŋŋlit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *håŋŋlijiv:* `håŋŋlit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *håŋŋlijma:* `håŋŋlit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON BADASS_TV  NEW badly assimilated two syllable transitive loan verbs. Makes nouns via -ár derivation. All passives. Err/orth taged in stem file

LEXICON BADASS_IV   NEW badly assimilated two syllable intransitive loan verbs. Makes nouns via -ár derivation. Only Sg3 passiv. Err/orth taged in stem file.

LEXICON ABBONERE_TV   Transitive loan words with more than two syllables with -erit/ierit endings. Duvvat passives. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. Only the two last syllables are assimilated to sami. LONG -e is assimilated in different ways in Norway and Sweden: In Norway, it becomes -ie, and in Sweden -e.

LEXICON BRILJERE_IV   Intransitive loan words with more than two syllables with -erit/ierit endings. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. Only the two last syllables are assimilated to sami. Long -e is assimilated in different ways in dialects in Norway and Sweden: In Norway it often becomes -ie, while in Sweden itºs usually -e.  

LEXICON BRILJERE_IV_INFL   

* briljierit # Contracted test examples:*
* *briljieriv:* `briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *briljeriv:* `briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *briljierijiv:* `briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *briljerijiv:* `briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *briljierijma:* `briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *briljerijma:* `briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

LEXICON ABBONERE_TV_INFL   

* abbonierit # Contracted test examples:*
* *abbonieriv:* `abbonierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *abboneriv:* `abbonierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *abbonierijiv:* `abbonierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *abbonerijiv:* `abbonierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *abbonierijma:* `abbonierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *abbonerijma:* `abbonierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1`

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
